Utah statutes.
26-21a-303.   Prostate Cancer Support Restricted Account.

(1)  As used in this section, "account" means the Prostate Cancer Support Restricted Account created by this section.

(2)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Prostate Cancer Support Restricted Account."

(3)  The account shall be funded by:

(a)  contributions deposited into the account in accordance with Section 41-1a-422;

(b)  private contributions;

(c)  donations or grants from public or private entities; and

(d)  interest and earnings on fund money.

(4)  Subject to appropriation, the department shall distribute funds in the account to one or more charitable organizations that:

(a)  qualify as being tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(b)  conduct programs that raise awareness of prostate cancer and its dangers; and

(c)  provide or support programs for prostate cancer early screening, detection, and prevention efforts.

(5) (a)  An organization described in Subsection (4) may apply to the department to receive a distribution in accordance with Subsection (4).

(b)  An organization that receives a distribution from the department in accordance with Subsection (4) shall expend the distribution only for programs within the state that:

(i)  raise awareness of prostate cancer and its dangers; or

(ii)  provide or support early screening, detection, and prevention efforts for prostate cancer.

(c)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules providing procedures for an organization to apply to the department to receive a distribution under Subsection (4).



Enacted by Chapter 440, 2011 General Session

